California, session 20252026, SB311.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3327 is added to the Penal Code, to read:3327. (a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall establish a secure facility at each women’s prison to house transgender women, in order to protect the security needs of biological women at birth in sleeping and other intimate areas.(b) The secure facility would allow the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to focus on the individual needs of the transgender women and biological women at birth populations.(c) Any inmate convicted of an offense for which they are required to register pursuant to Section 290, except for biological women at birth, shall be ineligible for housing at a women’s prison.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to address sexual violence in women’s correctional facilities.